Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,106
Board of Regents; lands in Lancaster County; power to sell; Agricultural Field Laboratory Fund; created; use.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska is hereby authorized to sell, on terms and conditions to be prescribed by the board, lands in Lincoln and immediate vicinity located in sections 2, 3, 9, 10, 11, 15, and 27, township 10 north, range 7 east, Lancaster County, Nebraska, which have been used for agricultural research by the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources and which function is being transferred to the Agricultural Research and Development Center and to other locations suitable for agricultural research. These lands are more particularly described as follows:

(1) The southwest quarter and that part of the west half of the southeast quarter lying west of the centerline of Stevens Creek and that part of the east half of the northwest quarter lying south of the centerline of Stevens Creek and that part of the west half of the northeast quarter lying southwest of the centerline of Stevens Creek, all in said section 2.

(2) The southeast quarter and the east half of the southwest quarter of said section 3.

(3) Lot 31 of irregular tracts in the southeast quarter of said section 9.

(4) Lots 15, 23, 25, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 38, and 39, of irregular tracts, all in said section 10.

(5) The north half of the northwest quarter, and the north half of the northeast quarter and irregular tract lots 1, 2, 4, 6, and 8, all in said section 11.

(6) Lot 51 of irregular tracts in the northeast quarter, and lots 1 through 16, Castleton, except for a parcel described as follows: A tract in lots 7, 8, 9, and 10, Castleton, beginning at the southwest corner of said lot 9, Castleton, thence north along the west line of said lots 8 and 9, a distance of seven hundred twenty-seven feet, thence east along a line perpendicular to the west line of said lot 9, a distance of one hundred nineteen and nine-tenths feet, thence southeast to the right on a curve having a radius of three hundred twenty-two and thirteen-hundredths feet through a central angle of eighty degrees thirty-two minutes a distance of four hundred fifty-four and seventy-five-hundredths feet, thence southeasterly a distance of four hundred fifty-six and six-tenths feet, more or less, to the south line of said lot 10, thence west along the south line of said lots 9 and 10 to the point of beginning; and lots 1 to 11, block 1, lots 1, 2, 17, 18, and 19, block 3, lots 1 and 2, block 4 and outlot A, Rosemont Fourth Addition, all in said section 15.

(7) Lot 56 of irregular tracts in the northwest quarter of said section 27.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Agricultural Field Laboratory Fund to which shall be credited all proceeds from the sale of such real estate. All money received from time to time pursuant to the sale of such real estate and which is credited to such fund is hereby appropriated to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska to be used exclusively for the development and improvement of the University of Nebraska Agricultural Research and Development Center at Mead, Nebraska, or for acquisition, development, and improvement of replacement real estate to replace the real estate described in subdivisions (1) through (7) of this section to be used for agricultural research. Money credited to the Agricultural Field Laboratory Fund shall be expended prior to the expenditure of any other legislative appropriation for the development and improvement of such center or replacement real estate.

Laws 1974, LB 938, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 73;

Laws 1997, LB 13, § 1.